South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 13, Title 46 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 46-13-250. (A) Prior to administering a barrier mosquitocide treatment, a person as defined in Section 43-13-20 must register with and obtain a license from Clemson University. (B) The registration and license must be free to applicants. (C) A person who violates the provisions of this section is subject to a fine of $500 per offense. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----